Massachusetts, session 194th, H1441.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 15A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by adding after section 45 the following section:-
Section 46. The department of higher education is hereby directed to promulgate
regulations establishing a standard whereby college credit is guaranteed at state colleges and
universities for students who achieve an advanced placement exam score of 3 or higher.
of 1